Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§§ 10.1-2100 through 10.1-2115.
Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act, see Article 2.5 (§ 62.1-44.15:67 through 62.1-44.15:79) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, recodified Article 1 (§

10.1-2100

et seq.) of Chapter 21 of Title 10.1, as Article 2.5 (§ 62.1-44.15:67 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Former §§ 10.1-2102 and 10.1-2112 were repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 785 and 819, cl. 2. Former § 10.1-2105 was repealed by Acts 2005, c. 41, c. 2.